tests/атте.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах атте":
    атте<n><nom> :  атте 
    атте<n><gen> :  аттен 
    атте<n><dat> :  аттене 
    атте<n><loc> :  аттере 
    атте<n><abl> :  аттерен 
    атте<n><ins> :  аттепе 
    атте<n><abe> :  аттесӗр 
    атте<n><ben> :  аттешӗн
    атте<n><px1sg><nom> :  аттем 
    атте<n><px1sg><gen> :  аттемӗн 
    атте<n><px1sg><dat> :  аттеме 
    атте<n><px1sg><loc> :  аттемре 
    атте<n><px1sg><abl> :  аттемрен 
    атте<n><px1sg><ins> :  аттемпе 
    атте<n><px1sg><abe> :  аттемсӗр 
    атте<n><px1sg><ben> :  аттемшӗн
    атте<n><px2sg><nom> :  аҫу 
    атте<n><px2sg><gen> :  аҫун 
    атте<n><px2sg><dat> :  аҫуна 
    атте<n><px2sg><loc> :  аҫунта 
    атте<n><px2sg><abl> :  аҫунтан 
    атте<n><px2sg><ins> :  аҫупа 
    атте<n><px2sg><abe> :  аҫусӑр 
    атте<n><px2sg><ben> :  аҫушӑн
    атте<n><px3sp><nom> :  ашшӗ 
    атте<n><px3sp><gen> :  ашшӗн 
    атте<n><px3sp><dat> :  ашшне 
    атте<n><px3sp><loc> :  ашшӗнче 
    атте<n><px3sp><abl> :  ашшӗнчен 
    атте<n><px3sp><ins> :  ашшӗпе 
    атте<n><px3sp><abe> :  ашшӗсӗр 
    атте<n><px3sp><ben> :  ашшӗшӗн
    атте<n><px1pl><nom> :  аттемӗр 
    атте<n><px1pl><gen> :  аттемӗрӗн 
    атте<n><px1pl><dat> :  аттемӗре 
    атте<n><px1pl><loc> :  аттемӗрте 
    атте<n><px1pl><abl> :  аттемӗртен 
    атте<n><px1pl><ins> :  аттемӗрпе 
    атте<n><px1pl><abe> :  аттемӗрсӗр 
    атте<n><px1pl><ben> :  аттемӗршӗн
    атте<n><px2pl><nom> :  аҫӑр 
    атте<n><px2pl><gen> :  аҫӑрӑн 
    атте<n><px2pl><dat> :  аҫӑра 
    атте<n><px2pl><loc> :  аҫӑрта 
    атте<n><px2pl><abl> :  аҫӑртан 
    атте<n><px2pl><ins> :  аҫӑрпа 
    атте<n><px2pl><abe> :  аҫӑрсӑр 
    атте<n><px2pl><ben> :  аҫӑршӑн
    атте<n><pl><nom> :  аттесем 
    атте<n><pl><gen> :  аттесен 
    атте<n><pl><dat> :  аттесене 
    атте<n><pl><loc> :  аттесенче 
    атте<n><pl><abl> :  аттесенчен 
    атте<n><pl><ins> :  аттесемпе 
    атте<n><pl><abe> :  аттесемсӗр 
    атте<n><pl><ben> :  аттесемшӗн
    атте<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  аттемсем 
    атте<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  аттемсен 
    атте<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  аттемсене 
    атте<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  аттемсенче 
    атте<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  аттемсенчен 
    атте<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  аттемсемпе 
    атте<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  аттемсемсӗр 
    атте<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  аттемсемшӗн
    атте<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  аҫусем 
    атте<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  аҫусен 
    атте<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  аҫусене 
    атте<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  аҫусенче 
    атте<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  аҫусенчен 
    атте<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  аҫусемпе 
    атте<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  аҫусемсӗр 
    атте<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  аҫусемшӗн
    атте<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  ашшӗсем 
    атте<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  ашшӗсен 
    атте<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  ашшӗсене 
    атте<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  ашшӗсенче 
    атте<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  ашшӗсенчен 
    атте<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  ашшӗсемпе 
    атте<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  ашшӗсемсӗр 
    атте<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  ашшӗсемшӗн
    атте<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  аттемӗрсем 
    атте<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  аттемӗрсен 
    атте<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  аттемӗрсене 
    атте<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  аттемӗрсенче 
    атте<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  аттемӗрсенчен 
    атте<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  аттемӗрсемпе 
    атте<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  аттемӗрсемсӗр 
    атте<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  аттемӗрсемшӗн
    атте<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  аҫӑрсем
    атте<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  аҫӑрсен 
    атте<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  аҫӑрсене 
    атте<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  аҫӑрсенче 
    атте<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  аҫӑрсенчен 
    атте<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  аҫӑрсемпе 
    атте<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  аҫӑрсемсӗр 
    атте<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  аҫӑрсемшӗн
